DI-200

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DIC2N-03

DTC

P06 17 S’larter Relay CircuitHigh

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

While the engine is being cranked, the battery positive voltage is applied to terminal STA of the engine control

ECU.

If the vehicle is being driven and the engine control ECU detects the starter control signal (STA), the engine
control ECU concludes that the starter control circuit is malfunctioning. The engine control ECU will turn on
the MIL and a DTC is set.

This monitor runs whenthe vehicle is driven at20 km/h (

12mph) forover 20 seconds.

(a) Vehiclespeed = 20km/h( 12.4mph)
(b) Enginerevolution = 1,000rpm
(c) STA signal ON

« Ignition switch
* Engine control ECU

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area
When all conditions (a), (b) and (c) are satisfied for 20 seconds
with battery (+B) voltage 10.5Vormore « Park/neutral position switch
1 trip detectionlogic « Starter relay circuit
P0617 (1 trip 90 Y
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Readfreezeframedatausingthehand  -heldtester. Freeze frame datarecordsthe engine conditions when

a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, ifthe engine was warmed up or not, ifthe air —fuel ratiowaslean orrich, as well as other
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

Whenusing hand -heldtester:

1 Connecthand -held tester,and check STA signal.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON, and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / STARTER SIG.
CHECK:

Readthe STAsignalonthehand  -heldtesterwhilethe starter operates.
OK:
Ignition Switch Position ON START
STA Signal OFF ON

OK> Go to step 5.

@

2 CHeck park/neutral position switch (See Pub. No. RM970E, page DI -32).

Go to next step 3 after the replacement.

NG> Repair or replace park/neutral position switch.

@

3Checkignition switch (See Pub.No. RM6 16E, page BE -20).

Go the next step 4 after the replacement.

NG> Replace ignition switch.
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4 | Connect hand-held tester, and check STA signal.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON, and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.
(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / STARTER SIG.

CHECK:
Read the STA signal on the hand-held tester while the starter operates.
OK:
Ignition Switch Position ON START
STA Signal OFF ON

@

e )

Repair or replace harness or connector.

5 Check DTC reoccur.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and hand-held tester main switch ON.

(c) Clear DTC (See page DI-3).

(d) Drive the vehicle more than 40 km/h (25 mph) for 20 seconds or more.

CHECK:
Check DTC reoccur.
RESULT:
Display (DTC output) Proceed to
P0617 A
No DTC output B

o

D

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RMG630E, page Fl -74).

DI-3).

Check for intermittent problems (See page
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When not using hand-held tester:

1 | Check voltage between terminal STA of engine control ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
STA (+) Turn the ignition switch ON.
/ é@ CHECK:
TEY BB B3 Measure the voltage between terminal STA of the engine con-
NN

li = lllt i ;' }'}E'I"i; M_\:' trol ECU connector and the body ground, while cranking the en-

gine (ignition switch START position) and while not engine
W W cranking the engine (ignition switch position ON).
Engine Control ECU OK:
P A19522 Connector A19630 Voltage:

6 V or more (ignition switch START position)
0 V (ignition switch ON position)

OK> Go to step 5.

@

2 | Check park/neutral position switch (See Pub. No. RM970E, page DI-32).

Go to next step 5 after the replacement.

NG> Replace park/neutral position switch.

3

3 | Check ignition switch (See Pub. No. RM616E, page BE-20).

Go to next step 5 after the replacement.

NG> Replace ignition switch.
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4 | Check voltage between terminal STA of engine control ECU connector and body
ground.
PREPARATION:
STA (+) Turn the ignition switch ON.
/ ED CHECK:
=00 Measure the voltage between terminal STA of the engine con-
FHY 'ﬁhgh ]Hlt [.‘Bﬂjﬁl'{”}'i HH M—;‘] trol ECU connector and the body ground, while cranking the en-
w' V%— gine (ignition switch START position) and while not engine
1 { . . . . . o
) cranking the engine (ignition switch position ON).
Engine Control ECU OK:
P At9522 Connector A19630 Voltage:

6 V or more (ignition switch START position)
0 V (ignition switch ON position)

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

5 Check DTC reoccur.

PREPARATION:
(@) Clear DTC (See page DI-3).

(b) Drive the vehicle more than 40 km/h (25 mph) for 20 seconds or more.

CHECK:
Check DTC reoccur.
RESULT:
Display (DTC output) Proceed to
P0617/89 A
No DTC output B
A Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI-74).
B

Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI-3).
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